North Carolina statutes. Chapter 104C. Atomic Energy, Radioactivity and Ionizing Radiation.
§§ 104C-1 through 104C-3.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1971, c. 882, s. 6.

§§ 104C-4,
104C-5.

Recodified as

G.S. 104E-1

to 104E-23.

Editor’s Note.

This Chapter was rewritten by Session Laws 1975, c. 718, s. 1, effective July 1, 1975, and has been recodified as Chapter 104E. Session Laws 1975, c. 718, s. 8, had provided that s. 1 of the act would expire June 30, 1981. However, Session Laws 1975, c. 718, s. 8, was amended by Session Laws 1981, c. 393, so as to delete the provision for expiration of the act.